Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 1. County Boundaries
§ 19-1-133.
Sunflower County.

Sunflower County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township twenty-four, range four, west; thence east on the township line to the line between ranges two and three, west; thence south to the northeast corner of section thirteen, township seventeen, north, range three, west; thence west along the section lines to the northwest corner of section eighteen, township seventeen, north, range three, west; thence south along west boundary line of township seventeen, north, range three, west, to the township line between townships sixteen and seventeen, range three, west; thence west along the township line to the range line between ranges five and six, west; thence north on the range line to the township line between townships twenty and twenty-one; thence east on said township line to the range line between ranges four and five, west; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Indianola.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 92; 1871, § 77; 1880, § 84; 1892, § 408; 1906, § 472; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3893; 1930, § 3954; 1942, § 3089; Laws, Feb. 15, 1844.

§ 19-1-135.
Tallahatchie County.

Tallahatchie County is bounded by beginning at the southwest corner of township twenty-six, range two, west; thence east on the township line to the line between ranges one and two, east; thence north on the range line to the township line between townships twenty-six and twenty-seven; thence east to the line between ranges three and four, east; thence south on said range line to the northeast corner of section thirty-six, township twenty-three, range three, east; thence west on sectional lines to the northwest corner of section thirty-four in said township and range; thence south to the line between townships twenty-two and twenty-three; thence west on said township line to the southwest corner of township twenty-three, range two, east; thence south to the township line between townships twenty-one and twenty-two; thence west to the Tallahatchie River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the line between townships twenty-two and twenty-three; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges two and three, west; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county sites are Charleston and Sumner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 53; 1871, § 78; 1880, § 85; 1892, § 409; 1906, § 473; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3894; 1930, § 3955; 1942, § 3090; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833; Laws, 1902, ch. 135.

§ 19-1-137.
Tate County.

Tate County is bounded by beginning on the Coldwater River, where the line between townships three and four intersects it; thence to the southeast corner of section thirty-three, township three, range five, west; thence south to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, township four, range five, west; thence east to the line between ranges four and five, west; thence south with said line to the southeast corner of section thirteen, township six, range five, west; thence west on section lines to the boundary line of Tunica County, on Coldwater River; thence up the meanderings of said river to the beginning. The county site is Senatobia.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 86; 1892, § 410; 1906, § 474; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3895; 1930, § 3956; 1942, § 3091; Laws, Apr. 15, 1873.

§ 19-1-139.
Tippah County.

Tippah County is bounded by beginning at a point on the state boundary line with Tennessee one mile east of the line between ranges two and three, east; thence east on said state boundary line to the line between ranges four and five, east; thence south on said range line to the line between townships two and three, south; thence east on said township line to the northwest corner of section two, township three, range five, east; thence south on section lines to the southwest corner of section two, township four, range five, east; thence east on section lines to the line between ranges five and six, east; thence south on the said range line to the line between townships five and six, south; thence west on said township line to the southeast corner of section thirty-three, township five, range two, east; thence north on section lines to the southeast corner of section sixteen, township three, range two, east; thence east on section lines to the line between ranges two and three, east; thence north on said range line to the line between townships two and three, south; thence east on said township line to the southeast corner of section thirty-one, township two, range three, east; thence north on section lines to the beginning. The county site is Ripley.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 70; 1871, § 79; 1880, § 87; 1892, § 411; 1906, § 475; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3896; 1930, § 3957; 1942, § 3092; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-141.
Tishomingo County.

Tishomingo County is bounded by beginning at a point on the state line bounding on the State of Tennessee two miles east of the line between ranges eight and nine, east; thence east on said state line to the Tennessee River; thence with said line up the said river to the mouth of Bear creek, on the state boundary with the State of Alabama; thence southerly on the state boundary to the middle of township seven; thence west on section lines to the southwest corner of section fourteen, township seven, range nine, east; thence north on section lines to the southeast corner of section ten, township four, range nine, east; thence west on section lines to the southeast corner of section nine in the township last named; thence north on section lines to the northwest corner of said section ten; thence west to the southeast corner of section five, township four, range nine, east; thence north on sectional lines to the beginning. The county site is Iuka.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 68; 1871, § 80; 1880, § 88; 1892, § 412; 1906, § 476; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3897; 1930, § 3958; 1942, § 3093; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-143.
Tunica County.

Tunica County is bounded by beginning on the Mississippi River where the line between townships two and three, south, intersects the same; thence east on said township line to the line between ranges nine and ten, west of the Chickasaw meridian; thence south on said range line to where it intersects Coldwater River; thence down said river to where it is intersected by a line extended west from the center of township six; thence east to the range line between ranges nine and ten, west; thence to the southeast corner of township six, range ten, west; thence west to the southwest corner of township six, range ten, west; thence south to the southwest corner of township seven, range ten, west; thence west to the boundary between the Chickasaw and Choctaw cessions; thence northwest with said boundary to the Mississippi River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the beginning. The county site is Tunica.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 77; 1871, § 81; 1880, § 89; 1892, § 413; 1906, § 477; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3898; 1930, § 3959; 1942, § 3094; Laws, Feb. 9, 1836.

§ 19-1-145.
Union County.

Union County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township six, range one, east; thence east on the township line to the northwest corner of section one, township six, range five, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section one, township seven, range five, east; thence west on section lines to the southwest corner of section four, township seven, range five, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section nine, township eight, range five, east; thence west to the northwest corner of section eighteen, township eight, range five, east; thence south to the southwest corner of section nineteen, same township and range; thence west to the northwest corner of section thirty, township eight, range four, east; thence north to the northwest corner of section nineteen, in the same township; thence west to the meridian line; thence north to the beginning. The county site is New Albany.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 82; 1880, § 90; 1892, § 414; 1906, § 478; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3899; 1930, § 3960; 1942, § 3095; Laws, Apr. 7, 1870.

§ 19-1-147.
Walthall County.

Walthall County is bounded by beginning on the Mississippi-Louisiana State line at the southwest corner of section thirty-six, township one, north, range nine, east; and run thence north along the west boundaries of sections thirty-six, twenty-five, twenty-four, thirteen, twelve and one, in townships one, two, three and four respectively of range nine, east, to the northwest corner of section one, in township four, north, range nine, east; thence east along the township line between townships four and five, north, to the northeast corner of section five in township four, north, range eleven, east; thence south along the east boundary of said section five to the northeast corner of the southeast quarter of said section; thence east along the half section line of section four, north, range eleven, east, to the northeast corner of the southeast quarter of said section four; thence south along the east boundary of section four to the southeast corner of said section; thence east along the south boundary of section three in township four, north, range eleven, east to the southeast corner of the southwest quarter of said section three; thence south along the half section line of section ten, township four, north, range eleven, east, to the center of said section ten; thence east along the half section lines of sections ten, eleven and twelve in township four, north, range eleven, east, to the southeast corner of the southwest quarter of the northwest quarter of said section twelve; thence north along the east boundary of the southwest quarter of the northwest quarter of said section twelve to the northeast corner of the said southwest quarter of the northwest quarter of said section twelve; thence east along the south boundary of the northeast quarter of the northwest quarter of said section twelve to the southeast corner of the northeast quarter of the northwest quarter of said section twelve; thence north along the half section line of said section twelve to the northeast corner of the northwest quarter of said section twelve; thence east along the north boundary line of said section twelve to the northeast corner of the same, this point being on the range line between ranges eleven and twelve, east; thence south along said range line seven miles to the northwest corner of section eighteen in township three, north, range twelve, east; thence east along the north boundary line of said section eighteen in said township three, north, range twelve east one-half mile to the northeast corner of the northwest quarter of said section eighteen; thence south along the half section line of sections eighteen, nineteen, thirty and thirty-one in township three, north, range twelve, east, four miles to the township line between townships two and three, north; thence east along said township line between townships two and three, one and one-half miles to the northeast corner of section five in township two, north, range twelve, east; thence south along the east boundaries of sections five, eight and seventeen in township two, north, range twelve, east, three miles to the southeast corner of said section seventeen; thence east along the north boundary line of sections twenty-one, twenty-two, twenty-three and twenty-four to the northeast corner of section twenty-four in township two, north, range twelve, east; thence south along the range line between ranges twelve and thirteen, one and one-half miles to the southwest corner of the northwest quarter of section thirty in township two, north, range thirteen, east; thence east along the half section line of section thirty to the center of said section; thence south along the half section line of sections thirty and thirty-one in township two, north, range thirteen, east, one and one-half miles to the township line between townships one and two; thence east along said township line one-half mile to the northeast corner of section six, township one, north, range thirteen, east; thence south along the east boundary of said section six one mile to the northwest corner of section eight in township one, north, range thirteen, east; thence east along the north boundary of sections eight, nine, ten, eleven and twelve in township one, north, range thirteen, east, five miles to the northeast corner of said section twelve; thence south along the range line between ranges thirteen and fourteen five miles, to the southeast corner of section thirty-six, township one, north, range thirteen, east, this point being on the Mississippi-Louisiana State line; thence west along said state line to the point of beginning. The county site is Tylertown.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3900; 1930, § 3961; 1942, § 3096; Laws, 1912, ch. 360.

§ 19-1-149.
Warren County.

Warren County is bounded by beginning on the Mississippi River when the township lines between townships nine, range eight, west, and eighteen, range two, east, intersect the same; thence east on said township line to the southwest corner of township nine, range seven, west; thence south to the Yazoo River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the range line between ranges three and four, east; thence north to the southeast corner of township nine, range seven, west; thence east to the Yazoo River; thence up said river to the point at which it is intersected by the section line between sections sixteen and twenty-one, township nine, range five, west; thence east to the northeast corner of section twenty-two, township nine, range five, west; thence south to the northeast corner of section thirty-four, township nine, range five, west, thence east to the northeast corner of section thirty-six, township nine, range five, west; thence south to the southwest corner of section seven, township eight, range four, west; thence east to the northeast corner of section fifteen, township eight, range four, west; thence south to the southeast corner of the same section; thence east to the northeast corner of section twenty-four, township eight, range four, west; thence south to Big Black River; thence with said river to the Big Boguesha; thence with the Big Boguesha to the Little Boguesha; thence with the Little Boguesha to its junction with the Mississippi River; thence along the western boundary of the state to the beginning. The county site is Vicksburg.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 83; 1880, § 91; 1892, § 415; 1906, § 479; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3901; 1930, § 3962; 1942, § 3097; Laws, Feb. 9, 1826.

§ 19-1-151.
Washington County.

Washington County is bounded by beginning on the Mississippi River, at a point where the line between townships nineteen and twenty intersects the same; thence east on said township line to the line between ranges five and six, west; thence south on said range line to the line between townships sixteen and seventeen; thence east on said township line to the center line of Sunflower River; thence in a southerly direction with the meanderings of Sunflower River and along its center line to the township line between townships fourteen and fifteen; thence west on said township line to the northwest corner of section three, township fourteen, range seven, west; thence south on section lines to the line between townships thirteen and fourteen, at the northwest corner of section three, township thirteen; thence west to the Mississippi River; thence up said river to the beginning. The county site is Greenville.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 3, art 2; 1857, ch. 2, art 33; 1871, § 84; 1880, § 92; 1892, § 416; 1906, § 480; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3902; 1930, § 3963; 1942, § 3098; Laws, June 4, 1800.

§ 19-1-153.
Wayne County.

Wayne County is bounded by beginning on the old Choctaw boundary line, where the line between ranges nine and ten crosses the same; thence easterly with said boundary line to the northwest corner of the Hiawanee reserve; thence direct to the northeast corner of said Hiawanee reserve; thence along said Choctaw boundary to the boundary line between the States of Alabama and Mississippi; thence south on said boundary line to the line between townships five and six, north; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges nine and ten, west; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county site is Waynesboro.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 85; 1880, § 93; 1892, § 417; 1906, § 481; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3903; 1930, § 3964; 1942, § 3099; Laws, Dec. 21, 1809.

§ 19-1-155.
Webster County.

Webster County is bounded by beginning at the northeast corner of section twelve, township nineteen, range eleven, east; thence west on the section line to a point where it crosses Big Black River; thence down said river, by the middle of the stream, to a point at which it is crossed by the township line between townships eighteen and nineteen, thence west on said township line to the range line between ranges seven and eight, east; thence north on said range line to the township line between townships twenty-one and twenty-two; thence east on said township line to the range line between ranges ten and eleven; thence north one mile; thence east on the section lines to the range line between ranges two and three, east of the Chickasaw basis; thence south on the western boundary of Clay County to the southwest corner of said county, at the southwest corner of section twenty-six, township twenty, range twelve, east; thence west on the section lines to the range line between ranges eleven and twelve, east; thence south to the beginning. The county site is Walthall.

This section shall in no way affect the present lines of Choctaw County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 83; 1892, § 418; 1906, § 482; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3904; 1930, § 3965; 1942, § 3100; Laws, Apr. 6, 1874; Laws, 1944, ch. 428.

§ 19-1-157.
Wilkinson County.

Wilkinson County is bounded by beginning at the mouth of the Homochitto River on the Mississippi River, thence, including Tansy Island, up said Homochitto River, with its meanderings, to the mouth of Foster’s creek; thence southeasterly up said creek, with its meanderings to the line between ranges one and two, east; thence south on said range line to the boundary line between the States of Louisiana and Mississippi; thence west on said state boundary line to the Mississippi River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the beginning. The county site is Woodville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 86; 1880, § 94; 1892, § 419; 1906, § 483; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3905; 1930, § 3966; 1942, § 3101; Laws, Jan. 30, 1802.

§ 19-1-159.
Winston County.

Winston County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township sixteen, range twelve, east; thence east on the township line to the northeast corner of township sixteen, range fourteen, east; thence south on the range line to the southeast corner of township thirteen, range fourteen, east; thence west on the township line to the northeast corner of section two, township twelve, range thirteen, east; thence south on the section line one-half mile; thence west to the line between sections three and four, same township; thence north on section line to the northwest corner of section three, in said township twelve, range thirteen; thence west on the township line to the southwest corner of township thirteen, range thirteen, east; thence north on the range line to the southeast corner of township thirteen, north of range twelve, east; thence west on the township line to the southwest corner of township thirteen, range ten, east; thence north on the range line to the southwest corner of township fifteen, range ten, east; thence east on the township line to the southeast corner of said township; thence north on the line between ranges ten and eleven to northeast corner of said township; thence east to the southeast corner of township sixteen, range eleven, east; thence north on the range line to the northeast corner of said township sixteen, range eleven, east, which is the beginning. The county site is Louisville.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 51; 1871, § 87; 1880, § 95; 1892, § 420; 1906, § 484; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3906; 1930, § 3967; 1942, § 3102; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-161.
Yalobusha County.

Yalobusha County is bounded by beginning at the northeast corner of township twenty-six, range three, east; thence east on township line between townships ten and eleven, west of the Chickasaw meridian, to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, township ten, range five, west; thence north along the east boundary of Panola County to the southwest corner of section twenty-two, township ten, range five, west; thence east twelve miles to the southwest corner of section twenty-two, township ten, range three, west; thence due south by the range line between ranges seven and eight, each of the Choctaw meridian, to the southeast corner of section twelve, township twenty-three, range seven, east; thence west on sectional lines to the southwest corner of section ten, township twenty-three, range five, east; thence north on sectional lines to the line between townships twenty-three and twenty-four; thence west on said township line to the line between ranges three and four, east; thence north on said range line to the beginning. The county sites are Coffeeville and Water Valley.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 54; 1871, § 88; 1880, § 96; 1892, § 421; 1906, § 485; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3907; 1930, § 3968; 1942, § 3103; Laws, Dec. 23, 1833.

§ 19-1-163.
Yazoo County.

Yazoo County is bounded by beginning at the northwest corner of township thirteen, range one, west; thence on a direct line southeasterly to Bole’s ferry, in section twenty-two, township twelve, range three, east, on Big Black River; thence down said river, with its meanderings, to the line between ranges three and four, west; thence north on said line to the northeast corner of section twenty-four, township eight, range four, west; thence west to the southwest corner of section fourteen in same township; thence north to the northwest corner of the same section, fourteen; thence west to the southwest corner of section seven, township eight, range four, west; thence to the northeast corner of section thirty-six, township nine, range five, west; thence to the northwest corner of section thirty-five; thence north to the northeast corner of section twenty-two in same township; thence west to the Yazoo River on the line between sections sixteen and twenty-one; thence up said river to the mouth of Sunflower River; thence up said river, with its meanderings, to the southwest corner of township twelve, range five, west; thence in a direct line to the northeast corner of said township; thence east along the south boundary line of township thirteen, north, range four, west, and township thirteen, north, range three, west to the southeast corner of township thirteen, north, range three, west; thence north along the east line of township thirteen, north, range three, west, to the northeast corner of same; thence east along the south line of township fourteen, north, range two, west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-six, township fourteen, north, range two, west; thence north along the line between sections thirty-five and thirty-six, township fourteen, north, range two, west, to the center line of the Yazoo River; thence down said river with its meanderings to the point of beginning. The county site is Yazoo City.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 2, art 23; 1871, § 89; 1880, § 97; 1892, § 422; 1906, § 486; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3908; 1930, § 3969; 1942, § 3104; Laws, Jan. 21, 1823.